Kentucky statutes. TITLE XV Roads, Waterways, And Aviation
Subdivision Road Districts

179.700.
Definitions.

As used in KRS

179.700

to

179.735

unless the context requires otherwise:

“Subdivision” means a group of residential structures or residential lots in an unincorporated part of the county which is served by roads constructed to provide ingress and egress for the residents. Subdivisions may contain nonresidential property so long as the principal nature of the subdivision is residential.

“Subdivision road district” means a district in a county or counties which has been established for the maintenance of public roads which are not state or county roads within that district.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 330, § 1, effective July 15, 1982.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A county has no statutory authority to expend any county road money or any other county money on public roads belonging to a subdivision road district, as defined in subdivision (2) of this section. It follows that a county has no authority to use county labor, equipment, or materials in assisting a subdivision road district in connection with its public roads, whether at cost or for free.

OAG 83-189

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Procedures for creating taxing districts, KRS

65.180

to

65.190

.

179.705.
Creation of subdivision road districts — Limitation on tax levy.

A subdivision road district may be created in accordance with the procedures of KRS

65.182

for the purpose of maintaining subdivision roads by the procedures set forth in this section.

In no event shall the subdivision road district be empowered to levy a special ad valorem tax of more than ten cents ($0.10) on each one hundred dollars ($100) of the assessed valuation of property in the district.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 330, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 100, § 15, effective July 13, 1984.

179.710.
Changing territorial limits of established district — Liability for taxes after change.

The territorial limits of an established subdivision road district, as established pursuant to KRS

179.700

to

179.735

may be enlarged or diminished in the following way: The trustees of the district shall file a petition in the county clerk’s office of the county in which that district and the territory to be annexed or stricken off, or the greater part thereof, is located, describing the territory to be annexed or stricken and setting out the reasons therefor. Notice of the filing of such petition shall be given by publication and posting in the same manner as provided for in KRS

65.182

. On the day fixed in the notice, the county judge/executive shall, if the proper notice has been given, and the publication made, and no written objection or remonstrance is interposed enter an order annexing or striking off the territory described in the petition. Fifty-one percent (51%) or more of the freeholders of the territory sought to be annexed or stricken off may, at any time before the date fixed in the notice, remonstrate in writing, filed in the clerk’s office, to the action proposed. If such written remonstrance be filed, the clerk shall properly give notice to the trustees of the subdivision road district and the county judge/executive shall hear and determine the same. If upon such hearing, the county judge/executive finds from the evidence that a failure to annex or strike off such territory will materially retard the functioning of the district and materially adversely affect the owners and the inhabitants of the territory sought to be annexed or stricken off, he shall enter an order, granting the annexation or striking off the territory. In the latter event, no new petition to annex or strike off all or any part of the same territory shall be entertained for a period of two (2) years. Any aggrieved person may bring an action in Circuit Court to contest the decision of the county judge/executive.

The property in any territory annexed to a subdivision road district shall not be liable to taxation for the purpose of paying any indebtedness incurred by the district prior to the date of the annexation of such territory, except such indebtedness as represents balance owing on purchase price of road equipment.

The property in any territory stricken off from a subdivision road district by the incorporation of or annexation by a city of this Commonwealth shall not be relieved of liability of such taxes as may be necessary to pay its proportionate share of the indebtedness incurred while such territory was a part of that district.

Territories stricken by action of the county judge/executive under the provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall be relieved of liability for all indebtedness incurred by the subdivision road district.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 330, § 3, effective July 15, 1982.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

A reference in the third sentence of subsection (1) of this section was changed to KRS

65.182

by the Reviser of Statutes pursuant to KRS

7.136

. The publication and notice referred to in this sentence were deleted from KRS

179.705

by 1984 Ky. Acts, ch. 100, sec. 15. KRS

65.182

contains the current applicable provision, but requires publication only.

179.715.
Board of trustees — Selection — Terms — Officers — Removal of appointed members.

Upon creation of a subdivision road district as provided in KRS

179.700

to

179.735

, the affairs of the district shall be conducted by the board of trustees consisting of seven (7) members, four (4) to be elected by the residents of the district as hereinafter set out and three (3) to be appointed by the county judge/executive. Four (4) members of the board of trustees shall be elected by the residents of the subdivision road district and shall be residents and property owners of the district. The county judge/executive of the county in which the greater part of the district is located shall, with approval of the fiscal court, appoint three (3) members of the board of trustees, who shall reside in a county in which the district is located. At the first election held after the district is formed, two (2) residents and property owners of the district shall be elected to serve on the board of trustees for a period of two (2) years and two (2) for a period of four (4) years. On the expiration of the respective terms, the successor to each shall have the same qualifications as his predecessor and shall be elected for a term of four (4) years. In the event of a vacancy in the term of an elected trustee, the remaining elected trustees shall elect a trustee to fill the vacancy for the balance of the term. The original appointed members of the board of trustees shall be appointed for terms of one (1), two (2), and three (3) years respectively; and on the expiration of their respective terms, the successor to each shall have the same qualifications as his predecessor and shall be appointed for a term of four (4) years. In the event of a vacancy in the term of an appointed trustee, the county judge/executive shall appoint a trustee for the remainder of the term.

The elective offices of members of the board of trustees shall be filled by an election to be held once each year on a date determined by the county judge/executive. The polls shall be located at the principal voting location in the district. The date, time, and place of the election shall be advertised in accordance with KRS

424.120

. This notice shall be advertised at least thirty (30) days prior to the election date and shall include the names and addresses of the candidates to be voted on for each position of trustee. The terms of the three (3) trustees appointed by the county judge/executive shall start at the same time as the term of the elected trustees. The terms of the trustees shall begin on the beginning of the fiscal year or calendar year, depending on which basis the subdivision road district is being operated.

Such trustees shall elect from their number a chairman, a secretary, and a treasurer, the latter of whom shall give bond in such amount as shall be determined by the county judge/executive of the county in which the greater part of the subdivision road district is located, conditioned upon the faithful discharge of the duties of his office, and the faithful accounting for all funds which may come into his possession as such treasurer. The premiums on such bonds shall be paid out of the funds of the district.

An appointed member of the board of trustees may be removed pursuant to KRS

65.007

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 330, § 4, effective July 15, 1982; 1996, ch. 136, § 4, effective July 15, 1996.

179.720.
Taxes levied by district — Maintenance of roads by county.

Upon the creation of a subdivision road district as provided in KRS

179.700

to

179.735

, the trustees of such district are hereby authorized to levy a tax rate upon the property in said district, provided that said property is subject to county tax, and not exceeding ten cents ($0.10) per one hundred dollars ($100) of valuation as assessed for county taxes, for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the maintenance of roads within the subdivision district. The rate set in this subsection shall apply, notwithstanding the provisions of KRS

132.023

.

The trustees of a district may contract with the county containing the district to perform maintenance on or to provide personnel, materials or equipment for maintenance to be performed upon any road in the district. The county may maintain or provide personnel, materials or equipment for the maintenance of the roads of a district, so long as the district agrees to pay the county’s total cost of providing services, personnel, materials or equipment.

The property valuation administrator of the county or counties involved, with the cooperation of the board of trustees, shall note on the tax rolls the taxpayers and valuation of the property subject to such assessment. The county clerk shall compute the tax on the regular state and county tax bills in such manner as may be directed by regulation of the Department of Revenue.

Such taxes shall be subject to the same delinquency date, discounts, penalties and interest as are applied to the collection of ad valorem taxes and shall be collected by the sheriff of the county or counties involved and accounted for to the treasurer of the district. The sheriff shall be entitled to a fee of four percent (4%) of the amount collected by him.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 330, § 5, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 65, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 2005, ch. 85, § 604, effective June 20, 2005.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A county has no statutory authority to expend any county road money or any other county money on public roads belonging to a subdivision road district, as defined in KRS 179.700(2). It follows that a county has no authority to use county labor, equipment, or materials in assisting a subdivision road district in connection with its public roads, whether at cost or for free.

OAG 83-189

.

179.725.
Minute book.

The secretary of the board of trustees shall keep a minute book, appropriately bound and marked, in which the minutes of each meeting of the board shall be kept, together with all resolutions, tax levies, and other important material the board may designate. A copy of all material required to be kept by the secretary shall be on file in the office of the clerk of the county in which the greater part of the subdivision road district lies. The public shall have the right to inspect the book and its contents at all times.

Subdivision road districts shall be subject to the provisions of KRS

65.007

,

65.060

to

65.070

and

65.164

to

65.176

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 330, § 6, effective July 15, 1982.

179.730.
Legal representation.

The board may, in its discretion, employ or retain a regularly licensed attorney to advise it on all matters pertaining to its duties and may delegate such authority to said attorney not forbidden by law.

In addition to the attorney provided for in subsection (1) of this section, the county attorney in the county in which the subdivision road district lies shall advise and represent the board in all matters and on the occasions when the board so requests.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 330, § 7, effective July 15, 1982.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Underwood, Part-Time Prosecutors and Conflicts
of Interest: A Survey and Some Proposals, 81 Ky. L.J. 1 (1993).

179.735.
Reimbursed expenses.

Members of the board of trustees of a subdivision road district shall be reimbursed for the necessary and reasonable expenses which they incur in the performance of their duties.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 330, § 8, effective July 15, 1982.